en: PLA - Polylactic acid, Polylactic acid
xx: PLA, 07 PLA, PLA 07, 07PLA, PLA07, 7 PLA, PLA 7, 7PLA, PLA7
ca: PLA - Acid polilàctic, Acid polilàctic
cs: PLA - polylaktid, polylaktid
da: PLA - Polymælkesyre, Polymælkesyre
de: PLA - Polylactide, Polylactide, Polymilchsäuren
el: PLA - Πολυγαλακτικό οξύ, Πολυγαλακτικό οξύ
es: PLA - poliácido láctico, poliácido láctico
fi: PLA - Polylaktidi, Polylaktidi
fr: PLA - Acide polylactique, Acide polylactique
hu: PLA - Politejsav, Politejsav
it: PLA - acido polilattico, acido polilattico
nb: PLA - Polymelkesyre, Polymelkesyre
nl: PLA - Polymelkzuur, Polymelkzuur
nn: PLA - polymjølkesyre, polymjølkesyre
pl: PLA - Polilaktyd, Polilaktyd
pt: PLA - Ácido poliláctico, Ácido poliláctico, poliácido láctico
ro: PLA - Acid polilactic, Acid polilactic
ru: PLA - полимолочная кислота, полимолочная кислота
sv: PLA - Polylaktid, Polylaktid
tr: PLA - Polilaktik asit, Polilaktik asit
uk: PLA - полілактид, полілактид

en: CPLA - Crystallized Polyactic Acid, Crystallized Polyactic Acid
xx: CPLA, 07 CPLA, CPLA 07, 07CPLA, CPLA07, 7 CPLA, CPLA 7, 7CPLA, CPLA7
bg: CPLA - Кристализиран полилактичен киселинен полимер, Кристализиран полилактичен киселинен полимер
ca: CPLA - Àcid polilàctic cristal·litzat, Àcid polilàctic cristal·litzat
cs: CPLA - Krystalizovaná kyselina polymléčná, Krystalizovaná kyselina polymléčná
da: CPLA - Krystalliseret polyactisk syre, Krystalliseret polyactisk syre
de: CPLA - Kristallisiertes Polymilchsäure, Kristallisiertes Polymilchsäure
el: CPLA - Κρυσταλλωμένο πολυγαλακτικό οξύ, Κρυσταλλωμένο πολυγαλακτικό οξύ
es: CPLA - Ácido poliláctico cristalizado, Ácido poliláctico cristalizado
et: CPLA - Kristalliseerunud polüaktiinhape, Kristalliseerunud polüaktiinhape
fi: CPLA - Kiteytynyt polylaktiinihappo, Kiteytynyt polylaktiinihappo
fr: CPLA - Acide polylactique cristallisé, Acide polylactique cristallisé
ga: CPLA - Aigéad polilactaide criostalaithe, Aigéad polilactaide criostalaithe
hu: CPLA - Kristályosodott polilaktinsav, Kristályosodott polilaktinsav
it: CPLA - Acido polilattico cristallizzato, Acido polilattico cristallizzato
nb: CPLA - Krystallisert polyaktisk syre, Krystallisert polyaktisk syre
nl: CPLA - Gekristalliseerd polylactisch zuur, Gekristalliseerd polylactisch zuur
nn: CPLA - Krystallisert polyaktisk syre, Krystallisert polyaktisk syre
pl: CPLA - Kryształowy kwas polimlekowy, Kryształowy kwas polimlekowy
pt: CPLA - Ácido poliláctico cristalizado, Ácido poliláctico cristalizado
ru: CPLA - Кристаллизованная полимолочная кислота, Кристаллизованная полимолочная кислота
sk: CPLA - Krystalizovaná kyselina polymliečna, Krystalizovaná kyselina polymliečna
sl: CPLA - Kristalizirana polilaktična kislina, Kristalizirana polilaktična kislina
sr: CPLA - кристализована полилактична киселина, кристализована полилактична киселина
sv: CPLA - Kristalliserad polyaktisk syra, Kristalliserad polyaktisk syra
tr: CPLA - Kristalize polilaktik asit, Kristalize polilaktik asit
uk: CPLA - Кристалізована полімолочна кислота, Кристалізована полімолочна кислота

en: LLDPE - Linear low-density polyethylene, Linear low-density polyethylene
xx: LLDPE, 07 LLDPE, LLDPE 07, 07LLDPE, LLDPE07, 7 LLDPE, LLDPE 7, 7LLDPE, LLDPE7, PE-LLD, 07 PE-LLD, PE-LLD 07, 07PE-LLD, PE-LLD07, 7 PE-LLD, PE-LLD 7, 7PE-LLD, PE-LLD7
de: LLDPE - Lineares Polyethylen niedriger Dichte, Lineares Polyethylen niedriger Dichte
fr: LLDPE - Polyéthylène basse densité linéaire, Polyéthylène basse densité linéaire
it: LLDPE - Polietilene lineare a bassa densità, Polietilene lineare a bassa densità
nl: LLDPE - Lineair lagedichtheidpolyethyleen, Lineair lagedichtheidpolyethyleen
nn: LLDPE - lineært polyeten med låg tettleik, lineært polyeten med låg tettleik

en: PETmet - Metalized polyethylene terephthalate, Metalized polyethylene terephthalate
xx: PETmet, 07 PETmet, PETmet 07, 07PETmet, PETmet07, 7 PETmet, PETmet 7, 7PETmet, PETmet7, met-PET, 07 met-PET, met-PET 07, 07met-PET, met-PET07, 7 met-PET, met-PET 7, 7met-PET, met-PET7
de: PETmet - Metallisiertes Polyethylenterephthalat, Metallisiertes Polyethylenterephthalat
fr: PETmet - Polyéthylène téréphtalate métallisé

en: PEmet - Metalized polyethylene, Metalized polyethylene
xx: PEmet, 07 PEmet, PEmet 07, 07PEmet, PEmet07, 7 PEmet, PEmet 7, 7PEmet, PEmet7, met-PE, 07 met-PE, met-PE 07, 07met-PE, met-PE07, 7 met-PE, met-PE 7, 7met-PE, met-PE7
de: PEmet - Metallisiertes Polyethylen, Metallisiertes Polyethylen
es: PEmet - Polietileno metalizado, Polietileno metalizado
fr: PEmet - Polyéthylène métallisé
it: PEmet - Polietilene metallizzato, Polietilene metallizzato
pt: PEmet - Polietileno metalizado, Polietileno metalizado

en: MDPE - Medium-density polyethylene, Medium-density polyethylene
xx: MDPE, 07 MDPE, MDPE 07, 07MDPE, MDPE07, 7 MDPE, MDPE 7, 7MDPE, MDPE7, PE-MD, 07 PE-MD, PE-MD 07, 07PE-MD, PE-MD07, 7 PE-MD, PE-MD 7, 7PE-MD, PE-MD7
de: MDPE - Polyethylen mittlerer Dichte, Polyethylen mittlerer Dichte
fr: MDPE - Polyéthylène moyenne densité, Polyéthylène moyenne densité
nl: MDPE - Gemiddelde dichtheidspolyethyleen, Gemiddelde dichtheidspolyethyleen

xx: EVOH, 07 EVOH, EVOH 07, 07EVOH, EVOH07, 7 EVOH, EVOH 7, 7EVOH, EVOH7, EVAL
en: EVOH - Ethylene vinyl alcohol, Ethylene vinyl alcohol, EVOH - ethylene-vinylalcohol copolymer, ethylene-vinylalcohol copolymer
de: EVOH - Ethylen-Vinylalkohol-Copolymer, Ethylen-Vinylalkohol-Copolymer
fr: EVOH - Ethylène alcool vinylique, Ethylène alcool vinylique, Plastiques / EVOH - Ethylène alcool vinylique

xx: EVA
es: EVA - Etileno-acetato de vinilo, Etileno-acetato de vinilo, Plásticos / EVA - Etileno-acetato de vinilo
fr: EVA - Éthylène-acétate de vinyle, Éthylène-acétate de vinyle, Plastiques / EVA - Éthylène-acétate de vinyle
it: EVA - Etilene-acetato di vinile, Etilene-acetato di vinile, Plastica / EVA - Etilene-acetato di vinile
nl: EVA - Etheen-acetaatvinyl, Etheen-acetaatvinyl, Kunststoffen / EVA - Etheen-acetaatvinyl
pt: EVA - Etileno-acetato de vinilo, Etileno-acetato de vinilo, Plásticos / EVA - Etileno-acetato de vinilo

xx: PAN
es: PAN - Poliacrilonitrilo, Poliacrilonitrilo, Plásticos / PAN - Poliacrilonitrilo
fr: PAN - Polyacrylonitrile, Polyacrylonitrile, Plastiques / PAN - Polyacrylonitrile
it: PAN - Poliacrilonitrile, Poliacrilonitrile, Plastica / PAN - Poliacrilonitrile
nl: PAN - Polyacrylonitril, Polyacrylonitril, Kunststoffen / PAN - Polyacrylonitril
pt: PAN - Poliacrilonitrilo, Poliacrilonitrilo, Plásticos / PAN - Poliacrilonitrilo

xx: PEF
fr: PEF - Polyethylène Furanoate, Polyethylène Furanoate, Plastiques / PEF - Polyethylène Furanoate

en: Lead–acid battery
xx: 08 Lead, Lead 08, 8 Lead, Lead 8
de: Bleibatterie, Blei-Säure-Batterie
es: Batería de plomo-ácido
fr: Batterie au plomb
hu: Ólom-sav akkumulátor
it: Batteria al piombo-acido
nl: Lood, Loodaccu
pl: Akumulator kwasowo-ołowiowy
pt: Bateria de chumbo-ácido
ru: Свинцово-кислотный аккумулятор

en: Alkaline battery
xx: 09 Alkaline, Alkaline 09, 9 Alkaline, Alkaline 9
bg: Алкална батерия
ca: pila alcalina
cs: alkalický článek
de: Alkalibatterie, Alkaline Batterie, Alkali-Mangan-Zelle
es: pila alcalina
et: leelisaku
fi: alkaliparisto
fr: Pile alcaline, batterie alcaline, accumulateur alcaline
hr: alkalni članak
hu: Alkáli elem, 19 Alkáli
it: batteria alcalina, pila alcalina
nb: Alkalisk batteri
nl: Alkalinebatterij
pl: bateria alkaliczna
pt: Bateria alcalina, pilha alcalina
ro: baterie alcalină
ru: Щелочной элемент
sk: alkalický článok
sr: alkalna baterija
sv: alkaliskt batteri
tr: alkalin pil
uk: Лужна батарейка

en: Nickel–cadmium battery
xx: 10 NiCD, NiCD 10, 10 NiCad, NiCad 10
bg: Никел-кадмиева батерия
de: Nickel–Cadmium-Batterie
es: Batería de níquel-cadmio
fr: Accumulateur nickel-cadmium, batterie nickel-cadmium
hr: nikal-kadmijeva baterija
hu: Nikkel-kadmium akkumulátor
it: Batteria al nichel-cadmio
nl: Nikkel-cadmium-accu
pl: Akumulator niklowo-kadmowy
pt: Bateria de níquel cádmio, pilha de níquel cádmio, bateria de níquel-cádmio, pilha de níquel-cádmio
ru: Никель-кадмиевый аккумулятор

en: Nickel–metal hydride battery
xx: 11 NiMH, NiMH 11, 11-NiMH, NiMH-11
de: Nickelmetallhydrid Batterie
fr: Accumulateur nickel-hydrure métallique, batterie nickel-hydrure métallique
hr: nikal-metal-hibridna baterija
hu: Nikkel-fémhidrid akkumulátor, Nikkel-metál-hidrid akkumulátor
nl: nikkel-metaalhydride-accu, NiMH-accu
pt: Bateria de níquel-hidreto metálico, bateria de hidreto metálico de níquel, pilha de níquel-hidreto metálico, pilha de hidreto metálico de níquel

en: Lithium battery
xx: 12 Li, Li 12
bg: Литиева батерия
de: Lithiumbatterie, Litiumbatterie
fr: Accumulateur lithium, batterie lithium, batterie au lithium, accumulateur au lithium
hu: Lítium akkumulátor
it: batteria al litio, pila al litio
nl: Lithium-ion-accu, Li-ion-accu
pt: Bateria de lítio, pilha de lítio

en: Silver-oxide battery
xx: 13 SO(Z), 13 SO, SO(Z) 13, SO 13
de: Silberoxidbatterie
hr: srebrov oksid baterija
hu: Ezüst-oxid akkumulátor, Ezüst-oxid elem
nl: Zilveroxide batterij
pt: Bateria de óxido de prata, bateria prata-óxido, pilha de óxido de prata, pilha prata-óxido

en: Zinc–carbon battery
xx: 14 CZ, CZ 14
de: Zink–Kohle-Batterie
hr: cink-ugljik baterija
hu: Cink-szén akkumulátor, Szén-cink akkumulátor, Szén-cink elem
nl: Zink-koolstofcel
pt: Bateria de zinco-carbono, pilha de zinco-carbono

en: Paper or cardboard
fr: Papier ou carton
it: Carta o cartone
sv: Papper eller kartong

en: Paper packaging
sv: Pappersförpackning

en: Cardboard, fiberboard, fibreboard
bg: Картон
ca: cartó
cs: lepenka
da: karton, Pap
de: Karton, Pappe
et: papp
fi: pahvi
fr: Carton, carton standard, cartonné, cartonnée
ga: cairtchlár
hr: karton
hu: Hullámkarton, Hullámpapír kartondoboz, kartondoboz
it: Cartone
lt: Kartonas
lv: kartons
mk: картон
nl: Karton, Strokarton, Vouwkarton, Massiefkarton, Turfkarton, Vormkarton, Kartonnen
pl: karton
pt: Cartão, cartão canelado, cartonado, cartonada, papelão, papel grosso
ro: carton
ru: картон
sv: Kartong
uk: картон